Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.261

Exemptions from RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271.

(1) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to require that a person obtain a license or a certified electrician in order to do electrical work at his or her residence or farm or place of business or on other property owned by him or her unless:

(a) The electrical work is on the construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease; or

(b) The electrical work is on property that is offered for sale within 12 months after obtaining the property.

However, if the construction is of a new residential building with up to four units intended for rent, sale, or lease, the owner may receive an exemption from the requirement to obtain a license or use a certified electrician if he or she provides a signed affidavit to the department stating that he or she will be performing the work and will occupy one of the units as his or her principal residence. The owner shall apply to the department for this exemption and may only receive an exemption once every twenty-four months. It is intended that the owner receiving this exemption shall occupy the unit as his or her principal residence for twenty-four months after completion of the units.

(2) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be intended to derogate from or dispense with the requirements of any valid electrical code enacted by a city or town pursuant to RCW 19.28.010(3), except that no code shall require the holder of a certificate of competency to demonstrate any additional proof of competency or obtain any other license or pay any fee in order to engage in the electrical construction trade.

(3) RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to common carriers subject to Part I of the *Interstate Commerce Act, nor to their officers and employees.

(4) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be deemed to apply to the installation or maintenance of telephone, telegraph, radio, or television wires and equipment; nor to any electrical utility or its employees in the installation, repair, and maintenance of electrical wiring, circuits, and equipment by or for the utility, or comprising a part of its plants, lines, or systems.

(5) The licensing provisions of RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall not apply to:

(a) Persons making electrical installations on their own property or to regularly employed employees working on the premises of their employer, unless the electrical work is on:

(i) The construction of a new building intended for rent, sale, or lease; or

(ii) Property offered for sale within 12 months after obtaining the property;

(b) Employees of an employer while the employer is performing utility type work of the nature described in RCW 19.28.091 so long as such employees have registered in the state of Washington with or graduated from a state-approved outside lineworker apprenticeship course that is recognized by the department and that qualifies a person to perform such work;

(c) Any work exempted under RCW 19.28.091(6); and

(d) Certified plumbers, certified residential plumbers, or plumber trainees meeting the requirements of chapter 18.106 RCW and performing exempt work under RCW 19.28.091(8).

(6) Nothing in RCW 19.28.161 through 19.28.271 shall be construed to restrict the right of any householder to assist or receive assistance from a friend, neighbor, relative, or other person when none of the individuals doing the electrical installation hold themselves out as engaged in the trade or business of electrical installations.

(7) Nothing precludes any person who is exempt from the licensing requirements of this chapter under this section from obtaining a journey level or specialty certificate of competency if they otherwise meet the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2021 c 51 s 1; 2013 c 23 s 37; 2007 c 218 s 83; 2003 c 399 s 302; 2001 c 211 s 19; 1998 c 98 s 2; 1994 c 157 s 1; 1992 c 240 s 3; 1986 c 156 s 16; 1983 c 206 s 21; 1980 c 30 s 12. Formerly RCW 19.28.610.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: Interstate Commerce Act, see, now, 49 U.S.C.A. Sec. 10101 et seq.

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Part headings not law—2003 c 399: See note following RCW 19.28.006.